Mississippi, session 2026, HB1625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Money Transmission Modernization Act for Virtual Currency Kiosks". SECTION 2. For the purposes of this act, the following terms have the meanings as defined in this section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Blockchain analytics" means the analysis of data from blockchains or public distributed ledgers, including associated transaction information to provide risk-specific information about virtual currency transactions and virtual currency addresses. (b)  "Blockchain analytics software" means a software service that uses blockchain analytics data to provide risk-specific information about virtual currency wallet addresses, among other things. (c) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance. (d)  "Elder adult" means a person who is sixty (60) years of age or older. (e)  "Existing customer" means an individual who transacts with the virtual currency kiosk operator following the fourteen-day period after the first virtual currency kiosk transaction with the virtual currency kiosk operator. (f)  "New customer" means an individual who has never previously transacted with the virtual currency kiosk operator.  The new customer shall remain defined as such during the fourteen-day period after the first virtual currency kiosk transaction with the virtual currency kiosk operator. (g)  "Transaction hash" means a unique identifier made up of a string of characters that acts as a record of and provides proof that the transaction was verified and added to the blockchain. (h)  "Unique identifier" means a number or other identifier that is assigned by a protocol established by the automated licensing system approved by the commissioner. (i)  "Virtual currency address" means an alphanumeric identifier associated with a virtual currency wallet identifying the location to which a virtual currency transaction can be sent. (j) "Virtual currency kiosk" means a stand-alone automated platform through which a consumer may deposit or receive cash or use a credit or debit card to obtain virtual currency services. (k)  "Virtual currency kiosk operator" means a person that engages in virtual currency business activity through a virtual currency kiosk located in this state or a person that owns, operates or manages a virtual currency kiosk located in this state through which virtual currency business activity is offered. (l)  "Virtual currency kiosk transaction" means a transaction conducted or performed, in whole or in part, by electronic means via a virtual currency kiosk.  Virtual currency kiosk transaction also means a transaction made at a virtual currency kiosk to purchase virtual currency with U.S. dollars or to sell virtual currency for U.S. dollars. (m)  "Virtual currency storage" means: (i)  Maintaining possession, custody or control over virtual currency on behalf of another person, including as a virtual currency control-services vendor; (ii)  Issuing, transferring or otherwise granting or providing to any person in this state any claim or right or any physical, digital or electronic instrument, receipt, certificate or record representing any claim or right to receive, redeem, withdraw, transfer, exchange or control any virtual currency or amount of virtual currency; or (iii)  Receiving possession, custody or control over virtual currency from a person in this state in return for a promise or obligation to return, repay, exchange or transfer such virtual currency or a like amount of such virtual currency. (n)  "Virtual currency wallet" means a software application or other mechanism providing a means for holding, storing and transferring virtual currency. SECTION 3. (1)  A virtual currency kiosk operator may not engage in virtual currency kiosk activity or hold itself out as being able to engage in such activity with or on behalf of another person unless the operator is licensed in this state as a money transmitter under the Money Transmission Modernization Act, Section 75-16-1 et seq. (2)  A virtual currency kiosk operator shall comply with all requirements of a money transmitter and shall be subject to the requirements of the Money Transmission Modernization Act. SECTION 4. (1)  A virtual currency kiosk operator may not use any sign or handwritten or printed paper using the words "automatic teller machine" or "ATM" or any other words in a manner reasonably calculated to convey the impression that the entity is engaged in the business of banking unless the act is done by or on behalf of an entity conducting banking activities pursuant to Title 81, Mississippi Code of 1972. (2)  Nothing in this section shall prohibit the commissioner from making a determination that a name proposed to be registered is potentially misleading to the public and requiring the registrant to select a name that is not potentially misleading. SECTION 5. (1)  (a)  The virtual currency kiosk operator, in establishing a relationship with a customer and before entering into an initial virtual currency kiosk transaction for, on behalf of or with the customer, shall disclose in clear, conspicuous and legible writing, both:  (i) in English; and (ii) in the language principally used by the licensee or authorized delegate to advertise, solicit or negotiate, either orally or in writing, for a transaction conducted in person, electronically or by phone, if other than English; all material risks generally associated with virtual currency. (b)  The material risks associated with virtual currency required to be disclosed under subsection (1)(a) of this section include, but are not limited to: (i)  A disclosure that is acknowledged by the customer and provided separately from the disclosures provided under subsections (1)(b)(ii) and (vii) of this section, and written prominently and in bold type, stating the following: WARNING: CONSUMER FRAUD OFTEN STARTS WITH CONTACT FROM A STRANGER WHO IS INITIATING A DISHONEST SCHEME. I UNDERSTAND THAT CRIMINAL ACTIVITY MAY APPEAR IN MANY FORMS, INCLUDING: (1) Claims of a frozen bank account or credit card. (2) Fraudulent bank transactions. (3) Claims of identity theft or job offerings in exchange for payments. (4) Requests for payments to government agencies or companies. (5) Requests for disaster relief donations or loans. (6) Offers to purchase tickets for lotteries, sweepstakes, or drawings for vehicles. (7) Prompts to click on desktop popups, such as virus warnings or communication from alleged familiar merchants. (8) Communication from someone impersonating a representative of your bank or a law enforcement officer. IF YOU BELIEVE YOU ARE BEING SCAMMED, CALL A LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER BEFORE ANY TRANSACTION. WARNING: FUNDS LOST DUE TO USER ERROR OR FRAUD MAY NOT BE RECOVERABLE. TRANSACTIONS CONDUCTED ON THIS VIRTUAL CURRENCY KIOSK ARE IRREVERSIBLE. I UNDERSTAND THESE RISKS AND WISH TO CONTINUE WITH CONDUCTING MY VIRTUAL CURRENCY KIOSK TRANSACTION. PROTECT YOURSELF FROM FRAUD. NEVER SEND MONEY TO SOMEONE YOU DO NOT KNOW. (ii)  Virtual currency is not backed or insured by the government and accounts and value balances are not subject to protections of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, National Credit Union Administration, or Securities Investor Protection Corporation; (iii)  A virtual currency transaction may be deemed to be made when recorded on a public ledger, which may not be the date or time when the customer initiates the virtual currency transaction; (iv)  The value of virtual currency may be derived from the continued willingness of market participants to exchange fiat currency for virtual currency which may result in the permanent and total loss of the value of a particular virtual currency if the market for that virtual currency disappears; (v)  The volatility and unpredictability of the price of virtual currency relative to fiat currency may result in a significant loss over a short period of time; (vi)  A bond maintained by the virtual currency kiosk operator for the benefit of the customers of the virtual currency kiosk operator may not be sufficient to cover all losses incurred by customers; and (vii)  Virtual currency transactions are irreversible and may be used by a person seeking to defraud customers.  As used in this subsection (1)(b)(vii), "seeking to defraud customers" includes, but is not limited to: 1. Impersonating a customer's family or friends; 2. Threatening jail time; 3.  Stating that a customer's identity has been stolen; 4.  Insisting that a customer withdraw money from the customer's bank account and purchase virtual currency; or 5.  Alleging that a customer's personal computer has been hacked. (2)  (a)  A virtual currency kiosk operator, when opening an account for a new customer and before entering into an initial virtual currency transaction for, on behalf of, or with the customer, shall disclose in clear, conspicuous and legible writing, using not less than twenty-four (24) point sans-serif-type font, both:  (i) in English; and (ii) in the language principally used by the licensee or authorized delegate to advertise, solicit or negotiate, either orally or in writing, for a transaction conducted in person, electronically or by phone, if other than English; using not less than twenty-four (24) point sans-serif-type font, all relevant terms and conditions associated with the products, services and activities of the virtual currency kiosk operator and virtual currency generally. (b)  The disclosure required under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall include, but is not limited to: (i)  The customer's liability for unauthorized virtual currency transactions; (ii)  The customer's right to stop payment of a preauthorized virtual currency transfer and the procedure used to initiate a stop-payment order; (iii)  The circumstances under which the virtual currency kiosk operator, absent a court or government order, will disclose information concerning the customer's account to third parties; (iv)  The requirement that the virtual currency kiosk operator communicate to the customer what customer information may be disclosed to third parties; (v)  The customer's right to receive a receipt for a virtual currency transaction at the time of the transaction; (vi)  Upon a change in the rules or policies of the operator, the customer's right to consent to the changed rules or policies before performing a transaction after the change; and (vii)  Any other disclosures that are customarily provided in connection with opening a person's account. (3)  (a)  A virtual currency kiosk operator, before each transaction in virtual currency for, on behalf of, or with a customer, shall disclose to the customer in an easily readable manner that is in clear, conspicuous and legible writing, using not less than twenty-four (24) point sans-serif-type font, both:  (i) in English; and (ii) in the language principally used by the licensee or authorized delegate to advertise, solicit or negotiate, either orally or in writing, for a transaction conducted in person, electronically or by phone, if other than English; the terms and conditions of the virtual currency transaction. (b)  The terms and conditions required under subsection (3)(a) of this section shall include, but are not limited to: (i)  The amount of the transaction; (ii)  The total amount of all fees, expenses, commissions and charges borne by the customer, including, but not limited to, applicable exchange rates, displayed both as a dollar amount and as a percentage of the transaction; (iii)  The type and nature of the virtual currency transaction; (iv)  A warning that, once executed, the virtual currency transaction may not be undone, if applicable; (v)  A daily virtual currency transaction limit; (vi)  The difference in the sale price of the virtual currency versus the current market price; and (vii)  Any other disclosures that are customarily given in connection with a virtual currency transaction. (4)  A virtual currency kiosk operator shall ensure that each customer acknowledges receipt of all disclosures required under this section. (5)  (a)  Before the acceptance of any cash or funding for a virtual currency transaction, a virtual currency kiosk operator must require every customer, regardless of age, to answer the following questions via an on-screen prompt or verbal attestation recorded by the virtual currency kiosk: (i)  "Is anyone on the phone with you right now, or communicating with you through an earbud or headset, telling you what to do or how to use this machine?" (ii)  "Are you sending this money to someone you have never met in person, such as government agent, online romantic partner, or bill collector?" (b)  If the customer responds "yes" or with a similar affirmative answer to either question asked under paragraph (a) of this subsection (5): (i)  The transaction shall be immediately declined and voided; (ii)  The virtual currency kiosk must display a "Fraud Warning" that instructs the customer to hang up the phone and contact local law enforcement; and (iii)  The virtual currency kiosk operator shall not collect any fees or funds from the customer. SECTION 6. (1)  A virtual currency kiosk operator, upon the completion of a virtual currency transaction, shall provide to the customer a receipt, in both physical (paper) and electronic (email or SMS) form, containing: (a)  The name of, and contact information for, the virtual currency kiosk operator, including, but not limited to, the virtual currency kiosk operator's business address and a customer service telephone number established by the virtual currency kiosk operator to answer questions and register complaints; (b)  The name of the customer; (c)  The type, value, date and precise time of the virtual currency transaction, transaction hash or identification number, and each virtual currency address; (d)  The amount of the virtual currency transaction expressed in United States currency; (e)  The public virtual currency address of the customer; (f)  The unique identifier of the virtual currency kiosk operator; (g)  The full amount of each fee charged, including, but not limited to, a fee charged directly or indirectly by the virtual currency kiosk operator, or a third party involved in the virtual currency transaction; (h)  The exchange rate, if applicable; (i) Any tax collected by the virtual currency kiosk operator for the virtual currency transaction; (j) A statement of the liability of the virtual currency kiosk operator for nondelivery or delayed delivery; (k) A statement of the refund policy of the virtual currency kiosk operator; (l) The name and telephone number of the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance and a statement disclosing that the virtual currency kiosk operator's customers may contact the department with questions or complaints about the virtual currency kiosk operator's virtual currency kiosk services; and (m) Any additional information the commissioner may require. (2)  The receipt required under subsection (1) of this subsection shall be provided in: (a)  A retainable form; (b)  English; and (c)  The language principally used by the virtual currency kiosk operator to advertise, solicit or negotiate, orally or in writing. The receipt may be provided electronically if the customer requests or agrees to receive an electronic receipt. SECTION 7. The total amount of fees and commissions charged for a virtual currency transaction shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the amount of the virtual currency transaction. SECTION 8.  A virtual currency kiosk operator shall not accept transactions of more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) in cash or the equivalent in virtual currency for new customers and Seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) in cash or the equivalent for existing customers.  Additionally, for new customers, the transaction limit shall not exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) in cash or the equivalent in virtual currency in the fourteen-day period after the first virtual currency kiosk transaction with the virtual currency kiosk operator. SECTION 9. (1)  As used in this section, the following terms shall have the meanings as defined in this subsection: (a)  "Live screening" means a real-time, audio-visual interaction between the customer at the virtual currency kiosk and a live representative of the virtual currency kiosk operator, conducted via a camera and microphone integrated into the virtual currency kiosk. (b)  "Third-party coaching" means an interaction between a customer and a third party during which the customer communicates with, or receives instructions from, a third party via telephone or other electronic device during the course of a virtual currency kiosk transaction. (2)  Upon the request of a customer, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall issue a refund to a new customer for the full amount of all transactions made within the fourteen-day new customer time period.  In order to receive a refund under this subsection (2), a new customer must have: (a)  Been fraudulently induced to engage in the virtual currency transactions; (b)  Contacted both the virtual currency kiosk operator and a government or law enforcement entity to inform them of the fraudulent nature of the transaction agency within ninety (90) days of the last transaction to occur during the fourteen-day new customer time period; and (c)  Submitted proof of the fraud incident, such as a police report or sworn declaration detailing the fraudulent nature of the transaction or transactions. (3)  Each virtual currency kiosk operator shall: (a)  Obtain a copy of a government-issued identification card that identifies each customer of the virtual currency kiosk operator; (b)  Maintain restrictions that prevent more than one customer of the virtual currency kiosk operator from using the same virtual currency wallet; and (c) Be able to prevent designated virtual currency wallets from being used at a virtual currency kiosk owned or operated by the virtual currency kiosk operator. (4)  All virtual currency kiosks operators shall use blockchain analytics software to assist in the prevention of sending purchased virtual currency from a kiosk to a digital wallet known to be affiliated with fraudulent, sanctioned or illicit activity at the time of a transaction.  The commissioner may request evidence from any operator of current use of blockchain analytics. (5)  All virtual currency kiosk operators shall take reasonable steps to detect and prevent fraud, including establishing and maintaining a written anti-fraud policy, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (a)  The identification and assessment of fraud-related risk areas; (b)  Procedures and controls to protect against identified risks; (c)  Allocation of responsibility for monitoring risks; and (d)  Procedures for the periodic evaluation and revision of the anti-fraud procedures, controls and monitoring mechanisms. (6)  All virtual currency kiosk operators shall offer, during the hours of operation of the virtual currency kiosks owned or operated by the virtual currency kiosk operator, live customer support by telephone from a toll-free telephone number prominently displayed at or on the virtual currency kiosk. (7)  All virtual currency kiosk operators shall designate a customer service representative to identify and speak by telephone with an elder adult who is a new customer before the elder adult who is a new customer completes his or her first virtual currency transaction with the virtual currency kiosk operator.  During the communication, which shall be recorded and retained by the  virtual currency kiosk operator, the virtual currency kiosk operator shall: (a)  Reconfirm any attestations made by the new customer at a virtual currency kiosk owned or operated by the virtual currency kiosk operator; (b)  Discuss the transaction; (c)  Discuss types of fraudulent schemes relating to virtual currency; (d)  Identify, through live screening or automated monitoring, whether an elder adult is engaging in or receiving third-party coaching; and (e)  Identify, through live screening or automated monitoring, whether an elder adult is on the phone or using a headset during the virtual currency kiosk transaction. The virtual currency kiosk operator's approval of the transaction shall be dependent upon the virtual currency kiosk operator's assessment of the communication. (8)  All virtual currency kiosk operators shall designate and employ a chief compliance officer who shall: (a)  Be qualified to coordinate and monitor a compliance program to ensure compliance with this section and all other applicable federal laws and regulations and state laws and rules; and (b)  Not own more than twenty percent (20%) of the virtual currency kiosk operator that employs the officer; and (c)  Use full-time employees to fulfill the virtual currency kiosk operator's compliance responsibilities under federal laws and regulations and state laws and rules. (9)  If the virtual currency kiosk operator determines, through live screening or automated monitoring, that a customer who is an elder adult is on the phone or using a headset during the virtual currency kiosk transaction: (a)  The virtual currency kiosk transaction must be immediately halted and voided; (b)  The virtual currency kiosk operator shall refuse to process any further virtual currency kiosk transactions for that customer for a period of no less than twenty-four (24) hours; and (c)  The virtual currency kiosk operator shall preserve and retain a record of the declined virtual currency kiosk transaction and the reason for the decline. (10)  (a)  The owner of any property where a virtual currency kiosk is located within or on, and any employees of the property owner, who knows or suspects that a vulnerable person has been or is being abused, neglected or exploited in the course of entering into a virtual currency kiosk transaction, shall immediately report such knowledge or suspicion to the Mississippi Department of Human Services or to the county department of human services where the vulnerable person is located in compliance with the requirements of Section 43-47-7. If the vulnerable person is a minor, then such report may be made to the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services as provided in Section 43-47-7. (b)  It shall be the responsibility of the virtual currency kiosk operator to ensure such property owner is made aware of the reporting obligations required under paragraph (a) of this subsection (10). SECTION 10. In addition to the powers and functions provided to the commissioner under the Money Transmission Modernization Act, the commissioner may exercise the following powers and functions: (a)  The commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement, administer and enforce this act. (b)  Any virtual currency kiosk may be seized, at the operator's expense, if the operator fails to comply with the requirements of this act or the Money Transmission Modernization Act. (c)  Whenever the commissioner believes that any person is failing or omitting or is about to fail or omit to do anything required by the provisions of this act, by the Money Transmission Modernization Act, or by any order of the commissioner, or is doing anything or about to do anything, or permitting anything or about to permit anything to be done, contrary to or in violation of this act or the Money Transmission Modernization Act or of any order of the commissioner, the commissioner may proceed with appropriate action as provided under the Money Transmission Modernization Act. SECTION 11.  Sections 1 through 10 of this act shall be codified in Chapter 16, Title 75, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 12.  Section 75-16-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-16-21.  License required.  (1)  A person may not engage in the business of money transmission * * * or; advertise, solicit or hold itself out as providing money transmission; engage in virtual currency kiosk activity; or hold itself out as a virtual currency kiosk operator unless the person is licensed under this chapter; (2)  Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to: (a)  A person who is an authorized delegate of a person licensed under this chapter acting within the scope of authority conferred by a written contract with the licensee; or (b)  A person who is exempt pursuant to Section 75-16-7 and does not engage in money transmission outside the scope of such exemption. (3)  A license issued under Section 75-16-29 is not transferable or assignable. SECTION 13.  Section 75-16-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-16-69.  Suspension and revocation.  (1)  The commissioner may suspend or revoke a license or order a licensee to revoke the designation of an authorized delegate if: (a)  The licensee or any authorized delegate, agent, or representative violates this chapter or a rule or regulation adopted or an order issued under this chapter; (b)  The licensee or any authorized delegate, agent, or representative does not cooperate with an examination or investigation by the commissioner; (c)  The licensee or any authorized delegate, agent, or representative engages in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or gross negligence; (d)  An authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of a state or federal anti-money laundering statute, or violates a rule or regulation adopted or an order issued under this chapter, as a result of the licensee's willful misconduct or willful blindness; (e)  The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the licensee, authorized delegate, person in control of a licensee, key individual, or responsible person of the authorized delegate indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the person to provide money transmission; (f)  The licensee or any authorized delegate, agent, or representative engages in an unsafe or unsound practice; (g)  The licensee is insolvent, suspends payment of its obligations, or makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors; * * * or (h)  The licensee does not remove an authorized delegate after the commissioner issues and serves upon the licensee a final order including a finding that the authorized delegate has violated this chapter * * *.; or (i)  The licensee is a virtual currency kiosk operator who has violated Sections 1 through 10 of this act. (2)  In determining whether a licensee is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice, the commissioner may consider the size and condition of the licensee's money transmission, the magnitude of the loss, the gravity of the violation of this chapter, and the previous conduct of the person involved. SECTION 14. (1)  For purposes of this section, "property" has the meaning given in Section 97-45-1(u). (2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all property used in the course of, intended for use in the course of, derived from, or realized through, conduct in violation of Chapter 19, Chapter 21, Chapter 45 or Chapter 49, Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, is subject to civil forfeiture to the state. (3)  Property subject to forfeiture may be seized by the Office of the Attorney General or any law enforcement agency in the State of Mississippi, acting as a recognized designee of the Attorney General's office, upon process with a seizure warrant issued by a circuit court having jurisdiction over the property.  Seizure without process may be made if: (a)  The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant; or (b)  The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgement in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this section. (4)  A circuit court having jurisdiction over any property may issue a seizure warrant under this section upon proper oath or affirmation from the Attorney General or any law enforcement agency in the State of Mississippi, acting as a recognized designee of the Attorney General's office.  The Attorney General or any law enforcement agency in the State of Mississippi, acting as a recognized designee of the Attorney General's office, that is seeking a seizure warrant shall provide the following information to the judge: (a)  Probable cause to believe that the property was used in the course of, intended for use in the course of, derived from, or realized through, conduct in violation of Chapter 19, Chapter 21, Chapter 45 or Chapter 49, Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972; (b)  The name of the person or financial institution from whom the property is to be seized; and (c)  A detailed description of the property that is to be seized, including the value of the property. (5)  Any property seized under this section by the Attorney General or any law enforcement agency in the State of Mississippi, acting as a recognized designee of the Attorney General's office, may be released to the owner of or lienholder on the property subject to the following requirements: (a)  The Attorney General or any law enforcement agency in the State of Mississippi, acting as a recognized designee of the Attorney General's office, shall notify in writing, by United States certified mail, the owner of and lienholder on the property at the last known address of the owner and of the lienholder how the owner or lienholder may retrieve or obtain the property.  If the owner or lienholder does not claim the property within thirty (30) days from the date of the receipt of the notice, the property is declared forfeited to the state, shall be liquidated if the property is not money, and shall be transferred to the State Treasurer for deposit and credit to the State General Fund. (b)  If the notice by mail is returned undelivered, the Attorney General or any law enforcement agency in the State of Mississippi, acting as a recognized designee of the Attorney General's office, shall cause to be made further search and inquiry to ascertain the reputed owner's or lienholder's street and post office address. If a new or additional address is ascertained, the Attorney General or law enforcement agency in the State of Mississippi, acting as a recognized designee of the Attorney General's office, shall again issue notice.  If a new or additional address is not ascertained, or if notice is again returned undelivered, the Attorney General or the law enforcement agency, acting as a recognized designee of the Attorney General's office, shall try to reach the owner or lienholder by any reasonable means and shall subsequently cause an affidavit to be prepared to that effect, which shall specify the acts of search and inquiry made in the effort to ascertain the owner's or lienholder's address.  The affidavit shall be retained by the Attorney General or law enforcement agency, acting as a recognized designee of the Attorney General's office, for three (3) years. (c)  If a seizure of property is made in which the reputed owner or lienholder contests that the property seized is subject to forfeiture, the reputed owner or lienholder shall file the notice with the circuit court having jurisdiction over the property who shall commence a forfeiture proceeding and hear evidence of whether the property is subject to forfeiture.  The burden is on the state to prove that the property is subject to forfeiture.  The standard of proof placed upon the state under the provisions of this section shall be by clear and convincing evidence. (d)  If it is found that the property is subject to forfeiture, the court shall forfeit the property to the Attorney General or law enforcement agency, acting as a recognized designee of the Attorney General's office.  However, if proof at the hearing discloses that the property was wrongfully seized and is not subject to forfeiture, the court shall order the release and return of the property to the owner or lienholder.  In addition, if proof at the hearing discloses that the interest of any bona fide lienholder, secured party or other person holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest is greater than or equal to the present value of the property, the court shall order release to him or her.  Property subject to forfeiture under this section encumbered by a bona fide security interest or other valid lien is entitled to a presumption of validity that it is subject to the interest of the secured party or lienholder.  The presumption is rebuttable if the Attorney General or law enforcement agency proves by clear and convincing evidence that the secured party had prior actual knowledge and affirmatively consented to the property being used in the course of, intended for use in the course of, derived from, or realized through, conduct in violation of Chapter 19, Chapter 21, Chapter 45 or Chapter 49, Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972. (6)  Property that has been stolen from its owner and recovered by the Attorney General or law enforcement agency, acting as a recognized designee of the Attorney General's office, if the owner can be identified, shall be returned to the owner after the preceding requirements are met.  It is the intention of the Legislature through this section to support the victims of the crimes enumerated in this section and return stolen property to the rightful owner. SECTION 15.  Section 75-16-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-16-71.  Notice and hearing.  (1)  Except where a license is automatically revoked without any act of the commissioner as specially provided in this section, no license shall be revoked except on ten (10) days' notice (the first day of the ten-day period to be the date stated on the notice, which shall be the day it is mailed) to the licensee by the commissioner, sent by letter by United States registered mail, return receipt requested, to the licensee's business address set forth in the application. (2)  Upon receipt of the notice, as stated in the registered mail receipt, the licensee may, within five (5) days thereafter (which five-day period may be wholly or partially outside of the ten-day period) make written demand for a hearing by the commissioner, which demand must be accompanied by an additional surety bond or securities deposit, as hereafter provided, the principal sum or the market value thereof to be specified by the commissioner in the revocation notice. (3)  The revocation notice shall not become final during the period of time in which the licensee may demand such hearing nor if licensee demands a hearing, until the matter has been finally determined by the commissioner or by the courts, provided that the licensee posts together with his written demand for hearing an additional corporate surety bond, written by the same surety that wrote the bond required under Section 75-16-63 or an additional deposit in addition to the deposit theretofore made by the licensee under Section 75-16-63 which additional surety bond or deposit shall be in a principal amount or of a market value deemed adequate by the commissioner as specified in the revocation order but not exceeding One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00), provided that if the licensee originally deposited with his application under Section 75-16-63 a corporate surety bond, the additional deposit provided in this section must be another corporate surety bond or an increase of the first one and may not be a deposit, or if the licensee originally made a deposit, the additional deposit shall also be of the same manner and not a corporate surety bond.  The bond or deposit shall secure the same obligations as does the corporate surety bond or deposit required by Section 75-16-63, but shall be in addition to the bond or deposit required thereby. (4)  Upon receipt of the written demand, the commissioner shall thereafter, with reasonable promptness, hear and determine the matter as provided by law or regulation. (5)  If the licensee deems himself aggrieved by the determination or order of the commissioner, he may within thirty (30) days after the determination or order, have the determination or order reviewed by an appeal to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, by filing a petition setting out the specific order or action or part thereof by which the person deems himself aggrieved.  All those petitions shall be given preferred settings and shall be heard by the court as speedily as possible.  Such an appeal shall be perfected upon the posting of a bond for the costs of the appeal accompanied by the petition.  Any party to the appeal may appeal to the Supreme Court of Mississippi from the decree or order of the chancery court, within thirty (30) days from the rendition of the decree or order, in the manner provided by law for appeals to the Supreme Court of Mississippi from chancery courts. (6)  Final revocation of the license, whether automatic or by final determination of the commissioner or the courts, shall cancel as of the date of final revocation all bonds or deposits theretofore deposited by the licensee under any provision of this section, provided that the licensee (and his corporate surety, if any) shall not be relieved of any accrued liabilities, and provided further, where the licensee made a deposit, that there shall not be returned to the licensee any of the deposit until the commissioner determines that all accrued liabilities (including, but not limited to, the principal sums thereof, accrued interest thereon, and court costs, if any, assessed to the licensee) of the licensee under this section have been satisfied in full. (7)  The commissioner may at any time revoke a license, on any ground on which he might refuse to grant a license, for failure to pay an annual fee or for violation of any provision of this section, subject to the provisions of this section. (8)  A license shall be automatically and finally revoked without any act or further act of the commissioner and without any right of the licensee to any hearing or further hearing by the commissioner or the courts and without any right of the licensee or the commissioner to reinstate or have reinstated the license, in the following instances:  (a) at expiration of the sixty-day notice period, if the corporate surety gives notice of cancellation of its bond or any of them; (b) upon failure by licensee to pay when due the annual license fee required by Section 75-16-31; (c) upon failure by licensee to file when due any information required by this chapter; (d) in case of a revocation notice under subsection (1) of this section, failure by the licensee to demand hearing as provided therein or failure to deposit any additional corporate surety bond or deposit as required by the commissioner; (e) upon a license revocation order becoming final at any stage; (f) failure by licensee to deposit when due any additional corporate surety bond or deposit required by the commissioner under Section 75-16-63(8); or (g) upon final conviction of licensee as to any offense covered by this chapter. (9)  If a revocation order becomes final for any reason or in any manner, the license may not be reinstated, except upon new application as if the licensee had never been licensed before.  The commissioner may deny the new application on grounds that a previous application was denied or a previous license to applicant was revoked or any ground or grounds on which he may deny an original application. SECTION 16.  Section 75-16-73, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-16-73.  Orders to cease and desist.  (1)  If the commissioner determines that a violation of this chapter or of a rule or regulation adopted or an order issued under this chapter by a licensee or authorized delegate is likely to cause immediate and irreparable harm to the licensee, its customers, or the public as a result of the violation, or cause insolvency or significant dissipation of assets of the licensee, the commissioner may issue an order requiring the licensee or authorized delegate to cease and desist from the violation.  The order becomes effective upon service of it upon the licensee or authorized delegate. (2)  When the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe that a person is violating any provision of this chapter, the commissioner, in addition to and without prejudice to the authority provided elsewhere in this chapter, may sue in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, to enjoin the person from engaging in or continuing the violation or from doing any act in furtherance of the violation.  In such an action, the court may enter any order or judgment awarding a preliminary or permanent injunction. (3)  An order to cease and desist remains effective until rescinded or released by the commissioner or appealed as provided in this section. (4)  A licensee that is served with an order to cease and desist may petition the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, for a judicial order setting aside, limiting, or suspending the enforcement, operation, or effectiveness of the order. SECTION 17.  Section 75-16-75, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-16-75.  Consent orders.  The commissioner may enter into a consent order at any time with a person to resolve a matter arising under this chapter or a rule or regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter.  A consent order must be signed by the person to whom it is issued or by the person's authorized representative, and must indicate agreement with the terms contained in the order.  A consent order may provide that it does not constitute an admission by a person that this chapter or a rule or regulation adopted or an order issued under this chapter has been violated. SECTION 18.  Section 75-16-77, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-16-77.  Criminal penalties.  (1)  A person who intentionally makes a false statement, misrepresentation, or false certification in a record filed or required to be maintained under this chapter or that intentionally makes a false entry or omits a material entry in such a record is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined no less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00), and may also be punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not less than one (1) year and not more than five (5) years. (2)  A person that knowingly engages in an activity for which a license is required under this chapter without being licensed under this chapter and who receives more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) in compensation within a thirty-day period from this activity is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined no less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00), and may also be punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not less than one (1) year and not more than five (5) years. (3)  A person that knowingly engages in an activity for which a license is required under this chapter without being licensed under this chapter and who receives no more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) in compensation within a thirty-day period from this activity is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and may also be confined to the county jail for not more than twelve (12) months. SECTION 19.  Section 75-16-79, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-16-79.  Civil penalties.  (1)  The commissioner may assess a civil penalty against a person that violates this chapter or a rule or regulation adopted or an order issued under this chapter in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per day for each day the violation is outstanding, plus this state's costs and expenses for the investigation and prosecution of the matter, including reasonable attorney's fees. (2)  If any person engages in business as provided for in this chapter without paying the license fee provided for in this chapter before beginning business or before the expiration of the person's current license, as the case may be, then the person shall be liable for the full amount of the license fee plus a penalty in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each day that the person has engaged in the business without a license or after the expiration of a license. SECTION 20.  Section 75-16-81, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-16-81.  Unlicensed persons.  (1)  If the commissioner has reason to believe that a person has violated or is violating Section 75-16-21, the commissioner may issue an order to show cause why an order to cease and desist should not issue requiring that the person cease and desist from the violation of Section 75-16-21. (2)  In an emergency, the commissioner may petition the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, for the issuance of a temporary restraining order ex parte pursuant to the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure. (3)  An order to cease and desist becomes effective upon service of it upon the person. (4)  An order to cease and desist remains effective and enforceable until rescinded or released by the commissioner or appealed as provided in this section. (5)  A person that is served with an order to cease and desist for violating Section 75-16-21 may petition the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, for a judicial order setting aside, limiting, or suspending the enforcement, operation, or effectiveness of the order. SECTION 21.  Section 75-16-83, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-16-83.  Investigation of possible violations.  In addition to and without prejudice to the authority provided elsewhere in this chapter, the commissioner, or his duly authorized representative, for the purpose of discovering violations of this chapter and for the purpose of determining whether persons are subject to the provisions of this chapter, may examine persons licensed under this chapter and persons reasonably suspected by the commissioner of conducting business that requires a license under this chapter, including all relevant books, records and papers employed by those persons in the transaction of their business, and may summon witnesses and examine them under oath concerning matters relating to the business of those persons, or such other matters as may be relevant to the discovery of violations of this chapter, including, without limitation, the conduct of business without a license as required under this chapter. SECTION 22.  Section 75-16-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-16-85.  Uniformity of application and construction.  In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it. SECTION 23.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.